Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Officers

7-81-301. Filling of vacancies.

The mayor has the power to fill vacancies occasioned by sickness, absence, or other disability of any town officer.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., § 2023a41; Code 1932, § 3672; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2522.

7-81-302. Suspension of officers.

The mayor has the power to suspend any officer for misconduct in office or neglect of duty, reporting the mayor's action, with reason for the action, in writing, to the next meeting of the town assembly, by whom final action shall be taken.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., § 2023a42; Code 1932, § 3673; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2523.

7-81-303. Mayor — Enforcement of ordinances.

The mayor shall take care that all of the ordinances are duly observed and respected.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., § 2023a44; Code 1932, § 3675; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2524.

7-81-304. Mayor having judicial powers.

The mayor has the power and jurisdiction and shall exercise the functions formerly exercised by a justice of the peace, but only for the preservation of peace within the corporate limits and the trial of offenses against the town ordinances.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., § 2023a45; Code 1932, § 3676; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2525.

7-81-305. Mayor's control of finances.

The mayor shall receive and hold all the moneys and property of the corporation, audit and pay all bills incurred by the corporation, but shall have no power to issue any negotiable paper. The mayor shall make, in writing, to each meeting of the assembly, an itemized statement of the money expended since the last meeting, and the financial condition of the town treasury.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., § 2023a46; Code 1932, § 3677; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2526.

7-81-306. Clerk as acting mayor.

In case of the absence, resignation, or inability to act of the mayor, the town clerk shall take the mayor's place until the next regular meeting of the assembly, when another mayor shall be elected, if the assembly shall deem the mayor's absence sufficiently long to warrant another election.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 22; Shan., § 2023a47; Code 1932, § 3678; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2527.

7-81-307. Duties of clerk.

It is the duty of the clerk of the assembly to attend each meeting of the assembly, to keep in a well-bound book a full and complete record of the acts and doings of the assembly, to file and safely keep all papers and records belonging to the corporation, to issue notice of the meetings of the assembly, and do all other service of a clerical nature imposed upon the clerk by the assembly.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 23; Shan., § 2023a48; Code 1932, § 3679; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2528.

7-81-308. Copies of records as evidence.

A copy of any record or ordinance made and certified by the clerk shall be prima facie evidence of its contents in all courts.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 24; Shan., § 2023a49; Code 1932, § 3680; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2529.

7-81-309. Sanitary inspector.

It is the duty of the sanitary inspector to thoroughly and carefully inspect the premises of each resident of the town, and to remove and abate all nuisances at such times as the assembly may prescribe, and to perform such other duties as the assembly may impose. The sanitary inspector shall, during such inspector's term of office, be vested with the powers and duties of a constable within the corporate limits of the town, but shall not serve civil process. The sanitary inspector's compensation and the manner of paying the compensation shall be fixed by the assembly. The sanitary inspector shall not be required to reside within the corporate limits of the town.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 25; Shan., § 2023a50; Code 1932, § 3681; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2530.

Collateral References.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 A.L.R.3d 665.